Wyoming, session 2026, SF0029.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxxix)(B)(intro) is
amended to read:

22-1-102. Definitions.

(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
SF0029

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0048
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:

(xxxix) "Acceptable identification" means:

(B) For purposes of in person voter
identification immediately before voting at a polling place
or absentee polling place, any of the following, provided
that the identification is not expired, is in the original
form in which it was issued and includes a photograph of
the person:

Section 2. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxxix)(B)(VII) through
(IX) is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0029